Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4319
Date; applicability.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act, on January 1, 2021:

(1) the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after January 1, 2021;

(2) the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trust directors, trustees, and cotrustees commenced on or after January 1, 2021;

(3) the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before January 1, 2021, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act does not apply and the superseded law applies; and

(4) an act done before January 1, 2021, is not affected by the Nebraska Uniform Directed Trust Act.

(b) If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before January 1, 2021, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 19.